New Jersey, session 221, S3847.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    The Legislature finds and declares that: a.     The Attorney General serves as the chief legal officer of the State of New Jersey, a role essential for representing the States interests.  However, it is crucial that legal positions on certain matters reflect the decisions of elected officials to ensure accountability and proper representation of the citizens of New Jersey. b.    Unlike the 43 states where the Attorney General is directly elected by the public, New Jerseys Attorney General is an appointed cabinet member who should not be permitted to take policy positions without the approval of the States elected officials. c.     In recent months, New Jerseys Attorney General Matt Platkin has filed and supported several amicus briefs, including one in which he joined 19 other states in urging the United States Supreme Court to block Tennessees ban on gender-affirming care for transgender youth.  However, granting the Attorney General the authority to file amicus briefs without prior approval from the Governor and the Legislature risks misrepresenting the States views and priorities. d.    As an unelected cabinet member, the Attorney General should not unilaterally represent the States interests in cases where the State is not a party.  The filing of an amicus brief may have implications for state policy and public interest, making it imperative that such filings undergo serious consideration and debate by elected representatives. e.     Ensuring that the filing of amicus briefs are subject to consideration by both the Governor and the Legislature promotes transparency, accountability, and public confidence in the legal processes of the State. 2.    The Attorney General shall not file an amicus brief in any case before a state or federal court in which the State of New Jersey is not a party unless a joint resolution is adopted by the Senate and General Assembly and signed by the Governor.  In the event that either house of the Legislature does not vote in favor of the joint resolution, the Governor may grant written authorization for the filing of the amicus brief, provided that the Governor issues such authorization after the Legislatures vote has occurred. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.